Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.583

Change of registered agent for service of process.

A foreign limited liability partnership may change its registered agent for service of process by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change in accordance with RCW 23.95.430.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5118; 2009 c 437 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.